Utah statutes.
77-32a-11.   Default not constituting contempt -- Relief allowed.

If it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the default in the payment of costs is not contempt, the court may enter an order allowing the defendant additional time for payment, reducing the amount thereof or of each installment or revoking the costs or the unpaid portion thereof in whole or in part.

